District of Columbia statutes.
47-2883.04

Penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this part or of any regulation promulgated by the Mayor under the authority of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this part, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this part, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this part shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Sept. 6, 1960, 74 Stat. 816, Pub. L. 86-715, § 4
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 433(a), 32 DCR 4450
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(u), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-504.
1973 Ed., § 2-2304.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $300”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(u) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.